Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325E.382] PLASTIC PERSONAL CARE PRODUCT CONTAINERS; BAN AT HOTELS AND HEALTH CLUBS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency. new text end new text begin (c) "Guest": new text end new text begin (1) means a person using the facilities of a health club; or new text end new text begin (2) has the meaning given in section 327.70. new text end new text begin (d) "Health club" has the meaning given in section 325G.23. new text end new text begin (e) "Hotel" has the meaning given in section 327.70. new text end new text begin (f) "Lotion" means a thick, smooth liquid or cream preparation designed to be applied to the human body for medicinal or cosmetic purposes. new text end new text begin (g) "Personal care product" means: new text end new text begin (1) shampoo, hair conditioner, bath soap, body wash, or shower gel that is intended to be applied to or used on the human body in the shower or bath; new text end new text begin (2) a disposable razor; new text end new text begin (3) lotion; new text end new text begin (4) hand soap; or new text end new text begin (5) hand sanitizer. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) A hotel or health club may not provide a personal care product in a plastic container, plastic wrapper, or other plastic packaging that a guest may remove from the premises. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this section: new text end new text begin (1) restricts the use of plastic refillable bulk personal care product dispensers; new text end new text begin (2) restricts the use of personal product containers, wrappers, or packaging that is not composed of plastic; or new text end new text begin (3) requires the use of refillable bulk personal care product dispensers. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin A hotel may make products restricted under subdivision 2 available to a guest upon request. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Violations; penalties. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may enforce this section under section 116.072. A county board may enforce this section after complying with the requirements of section 116.072, subdivision 1, paragraphs (b) and (c). new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding section 116.072, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), the commissioner or county board must, upon a first violation of this section, issue a notice of violation by certified mail to the violator, but may not assess a monetary penalty. For subsequent violations, the commissioner or county board may assess a civil penalty of up to $500 for each day of violation. No more than $10,000 in civil penalties may be assessed to a single establishment annually under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, for a health club and for a hotel with 50 or more lodging units and is effective January 1, 2028, for a hotel with fewer than 50 lodging units. new text end